Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

14-13.7-501. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration may be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it if it is consistent with the public policy of the state.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 634, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-502. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This article modifies, limits, or supersedes the "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. section 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 (c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001 (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 (b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7003 (b).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 635, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-503. Saving clause.

This article does not affect the validity of an interim court order concerning custodial responsibility during deployment that was entered before July 1, 2013.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 635, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-504. Effective date.

This article takes effect July 1, 2013.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 635, § 2, effective May 10.